vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván cánh: Phụ kiện lướt ván cánh; Ván lướt ván cánh; Cánh lái đuôi; Bộ wingfoil trọn gói; Linh kiện lướt ván cánh; Cánh buồm lướt ván cánh
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Уиндфойл: Аксесоари за уингфойл; Дъски за уингфойл; Фойл за уингфойл; Комплекти за уиндфойл; Части за уингфойл; Крила за уиндфойл
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Wingfoiling: Príslušenstvo k wingfoilingu; Dosky k wingfoilingu; Wingfoilingové fólie; Balíky wingfoilu; Diely wingfoilingu; Wingfoilingové krídla
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Szárnyszörfözés: Szárnyszörfözési kiegészítők; Szárnyszörfözési deszkák; Szárnyszörfözési fóliák; Wingfoil csomagok; Szárnyszörfözés alkatrészek; Szárnyszörfözési szárnyak
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 风翼冲浪: 风翼冲浪配件; 风翼冲浪板; 风翼水翼; 风翼冲浪套装; 风翼冲浪部件; 风翼
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Wingfoiling: Akcesoria do wingfoila; Deski do wingfoila; Foile do wingfoila; Pakiety sprzętu do wingfoila; Części do wingfoila; Wingi do wingfoila
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Wingfoil: Wingfoil Aksesuarları; Wingfoil Tahtaları; Wingfoil Folyoları; Wingfoil paketleri; Wingfoil Parçaları; Wingfoil Kanatları
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Вингфойлинг: Аксессуары для вингфойлинга; Доски для вингфойлинга; Крылья для вингфойлинга; Комплекты для вингфойлинга; Компоненты для вингфойлинга; Крылья для вингфойлинга
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Wingfoiling: Dodaci za wingfoiling; Daske za wingfoiling; Hidrokrila za wingfoiling; Paketi za wingfoiling; Dijelovi opreme za wingfoiling; Krila za wingfoiling
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Aitvaravimas: Aitvaravimo priedai; Aitvaravimo lentos; Aitvaravimo vandensparniai; Aitvaravimo pakuotės; Aitvaravimo dalys; Aitvaravimo sparnai
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Wingfoiling: Accesorii pentru wingfoil; Plăci pentru wingfoiling; Folii pentru wingfoiling; Pachete wingfoil; Piese pentru wingfoiling; Aripi pentru wingfoiling
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Wingfoiling: Αξεσουάρ Wingfoil; Σανίδες Wingfoil; Foils για Wingfoil; Πακέτα wingfoil; Ανταλλακτικά Wingfoil; Φτερά Wingfoil
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 水翼風翼: 水翼風翼配件; 水翼風翼板; 水翼風翼箔片; 風翼水翼套裝; 水翼風翼零件; 風翼
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Wingsurfen: Zubehör für Wingsurfen; Wingfoilboards; Foilen für Wingsurfen; Wingfoil-Komplettsets; Ersatzteile für Wingsurfen; Wings für Wingsurfen
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Foilanje: Dodatki za foilanje; Deske za foilanje; Foili za foilanje; Paketi za foilanje s krilom; Deli za foilanje; Krila za foilanje
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Foilpurjelautailu: Foilpurjelautailuvarusteet; Foilpurjelautailulaudat; Foilpurjelautailufoilit; Wingfoil-pakkaukset; Foilpurjelautailuosat; Foilpurjelautailusiivet
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Wingfoil: Accessori per wingfoil; Tavole da wingfoil; Foil per wingfoil; Pacchetti wingfoil; Parti del wingfoil; Ali per wingfoil
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Wingfoiling: Wingfoil – doplňky; Wingfoil – prkna; Wingfoil – foily; Komplety pro wingfoiling; Wingfoil – součásti; Wingfoil – wingy/křídla
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Wingfoiling: Wingfoil-utstyr; Wingfoil-brett; Wingfoil-foilbrett; Wingfoil-pakker; Wingfoil-deler; Wingfoil-vinge
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Wingfoiling: Wingfoil Accessories; Wingfoil Boards; Wingfoil Foils; Wingfoil Packages; Wingfoil Parts; Wingfoil Wings
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Wingsurfing: Tilbehør til wingsurfing; Bræt til wingsurfing; Folie til wingsurfing; Pakker til wingfoil; Dele til wingsurfing; Vinger til wingsurfing
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Wingfoilen: Wingfoilaccessoires; Wingfoil borden; Wingfoilfoils; Wingfoil-pakketten; Wingfoilonderdelen; Wingfoilvleugels
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Wingfoiling: Accesorios para wingfoil; Tablas de wingfoil; Aletas de wingfoil; Paquetes para wingfoil; Piezas de wingfoil; Alas de wingfoil
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Wingfoiling: Acessórios de Wingfoil; Pranchas de Wingfoil; Foil de wingfoil; Pacotes de wingfoil; Peças de wingfoil; Asas de wingfoil
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > ウイングフォイル: ウィングフォイルアクセサリー; ウィングフォイルボード; ウィングフォイルフォイル; ウィングフォイルパッケージ; ウイングフォイルパーツ; ウィングフォイルウィング
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Wingfoil: Accessoires pour wingfoil; Planches de wingfoil; Foils de wingfoil; Packs de wingfoil; Pièces de wingfoil; Ailes de wingfoil
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Wingfoil: Acessórios de wingfoil; Pranchas de wingfoil; Asas dianteiras de wingfoil; Conjuntos de wingfoil; Peças de wingfoil; Asa de wingfoil
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 윙포일링: 윙포일 액세서리; 윙포일 보드; 윙포일 포일; 윙포일 패키지; 윙포일 부품; 윙포일 윙
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > วิงฟอยล์: อุปกรณ์เสริมวิงฟอยล์; บอร์ดวิงฟอยล์; ฟอยล์วิงฟอยล์; แพ็คเกจวิงฟอยล์; ชิ้นส่วนวิงฟอยล์; ปีกวิงฟอยล์
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Wingfoiling: Wingfoil-tillbehör; Wingfoil-brädor; Wingfoil-folier; Wingfoil-paket; Wingfoil-delar; Wingfoil-vingar